Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1785
Dormant accounts.

If there has been no activity in a share account for one year, except for the posting of dividends, a credit union may impose a reasonable maintenance fee as provided in the bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 85.